North Carolina statutes. Chapter 10B. Notaries.
Part 1. General Provisions.

§ 10B-100.
Short title.

This Article is the Electronic Notary Public Act and may be cited by that name.

History.

2005-391, s. 4.

§ 10B-101.
Definitions.

The following definitions apply in this Article:

“Electronic” means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

“Electronic Document” means information that is created, generated, sent, communicated, received, or stored by electronic means.

“Electronic Notarial Act” and “Electronic Notarization” mean an official act by an electronic notary public that involves electronic documents.

“Electronic Notary Public” and “Electronic Notary” mean a notary public who has registered with the Secretary the capability of performing electronic notarial acts in conformance with this Article.

“Electronic Notary Seal” and “Electronic Seal” mean information within a notarized electronic document that includes the notary’s name, jurisdiction, and commission expiration date, and generally corresponds to data in notary seals used on paper documents.

“Electronic Signatures” means an electronic symbol or process attached to or logically associated with an electronic document and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the document.

“Notary’s Electronic Signature” means those forms of electronic signature which have been approved by the Secretary as authorized in

G.S. 10B-125

, as an acceptable means for an electronic notary to affix the notary’s official signature to an electronic record that is being notarized.

History.

2005-391, s. 4.

§ 10B-102.
Scope of this Article.

Article 1 of this Chapter applies to all acts authorized under this Article unless the provisions of Article 1 directly conflict with the provisions of this Article, in which case provisions of Article 2 shall control.

History.

2005-391, s. 4.

§§ 10B-103,
10B-104.

Reserved for future codification purposes.